Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.22
Line-make, defined.

Line-make means a collection
of models, series, or groups of motor vehicles manufactured by or for a particular
manufacturer, distributor, or importer that are offered for sale, lease, or
distribution pursuant to a common brand name or mark, except that:

(1) Multiple brand names
or marks may constitute a single line-make, but only when included in a common
dealer agreement and the manufacturer, distributor, or importer offers such
vehicles bearing the multiple names or marks together only, and not separately,
to its authorized dealers; and

(2) Motor vehicles bearing a common brand name or
mark may constitute separate line-makes when pertaining to motor vehicles
subject to separate dealer agreements or when such vehicles are intended for
different types of use.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 34.